New York, session 2025-2026, S1995.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 5205 of the civil practice law and rules is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision (q) to read as follows: 3 (q) Any personal property, including but not limited to income, owned 4 by a person who is subject to a money judgment arising from an action in 5 another state for knowingly engaging in conduct that aids or abets the 6 performance or inducement of an abortion is exempt from application to 7 the satisfaction of such money judgment. 8 § 2. Section 5206 of the civil practice law and rules is amended by 9 adding a new subdivision (g) to read as follows: 10 (g) Any real property owned by a person who is subject to a money 11 judgment arising from an action in another state for knowingly engaging 12 in conduct that aids or abets the performance or inducement of an 13 abortion is exempt from application to the satisfaction of such money 14 judgment. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03381-01-5